Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act  is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Enrollee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Established local rate” means the rate established where the health care  services
originated for the provision  of ground ambulance services through a publicly accessible
process that includes an analysis of the cost to provide the ground ambulance services by:
(A) The local government entity if the  ground ambulance services are provided by ground
ambulance services organizations that are  owned or operated by the local government entity;
or
(B) The contract between a privately owned  or operated ground ambulance services or-
ganization and the  local government entity if the ground ambulance services are provided
by a privately owned or operated ground ambulance services organization.
(c) “Ground ambulance services” means:
(A) The rendering of medical treatment and care  at the scene of a medical emergency
or while transporting an individual from the scene to an appropriate health care facility
when the services are provided by one or more ground ambulance  vehicles designed for this
purpose; and
(B) Transport between health care facilities  when the services are medically necessary
and are provided by one or more ground ambulance vehicles designed for this purpose.
(d) “Ground ambulance services organization”  means a public or private organization li-
censed by the  Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 682.045 to provide ground ambu-
lance services.
(e) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005, except that
“health  benefit  plan” does not include a coverage offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit
Board or the  Oregon Educators Benefit Board through a commercial insurer, a health care
service contractor or a third party administrator.
(f) “Health care  facility” means a facility that provides health care services directly to
patients, including but not limited to a  hospital, clinic, health care provider’s office, health
maintenance organization, diagnostic or treatment center, mental health facility, behavioral
health service provider, emergency services provider or hospice or nursing home.
(g) “In-network” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.280.
Enrolled House Bill 3243 (HB 3243-B) Page 1
(2) A ground ambulance service  may not bill an enrollee for covered ground ambulance
services if the enrollee has paid the  in-network cost-sharing amount specified in the
enrollee’s health benefit plan.
(3) A  health benefit plan must reimburse the ground ambulance services organization at
the established local rate or if an established local rate does not exist, in an amount  no less
than 325 percent of the Medicare rate.
(4) Ground ambulance services organizations shall submit a catalog of established local
rates to the  Department of Consumer and Business Services annually and within five calen-
dar days of a change to the rates.
(5) The department shall create a database of established local rates  for ground ambu-
lance services. The department shall ensure this database is accessible by the public.
(6) The provisions of this section apply to a  self-funded group health plan whether gov-
erned by or exempt from  the provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974 (29 U.S.C.  1001 et seq.), as amended, only if the self-funded group health plan elects
to participate in the provisions of this section by providing notice to the department in the
form and manner described by the department by rule.
(7) The  Public Employees’ Benefit Board and the Oregon Educators Benefit Board may
elect to participate in the coverage provisions described in this section by providing notice
to the department in the form and manner described by the department by rule.
(8) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
(9) The department shall make rules to implement the provisions described  in this sec-
tion.
(10) The department may impose civil penalties, as described in ORS 731.988, but  may not
exceed $1,000 for repeated violations of this section.
SECTION 3.
No later than September 15, 2026, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services shall submit  a report in the form and manner described in ORS 192.245 to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health. The report shall include:
(1) All consumer complaints  received by the department concerning billing for services
provided by ground ambulance services organizations both before and after  the implementa-
tion of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The number of contracts ground ambulance services  organizations and health benefit
plans entered into on or after January 1, 2026.
(3) Any effect  on the premium rates for health benefit plans that occurred on or after
January 1, 2026, and can be attributed to the implementation of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $502,113
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services, for the Division of Financial Regulation, for the purpose of carrying
out sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act applies to health benefit plans issued, renewed or
extended on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3243 (HB 3243-B) Page 2
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3243 (HB 3243-B) Page 3